Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 8, chapter 96, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1)  Sections 1 to 7 [ of this 2016 Act ], chapter 96, Oregon Laws 2016,  are repealed on
January 2, [ 2027] 2033.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, property that has been granted  a property tax
incentive program benefit under sections 1 to 7 [ of this 2016 Act ], chapter 96, Oregon Laws 2016,
before the date specified in subsection (1) of this section,  shall continue to receive the benefit for
the period of time for which the benefit was granted.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 99 (SB 99-INTRO) Page 1